Nevada, session 83, SB212.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to City of Hope the sum of $50,000,000 to establish
an outpatient cancer treatment clinic in Clark County.
2. The money appropriated by subsection 1 may be used to:
(a) Lease office space;
(b) Make tenant improvements;
(c) Purchase office equipment;
(d) Purchase specialized medical equipment; and
(e) Pay staff of the treatment clinic.
3. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
City of Hope agrees to:
(a) On or before January 1, 2026, enter into an affiliation
agreement with the Kirk Kerkorian School of Medicine at the
University of Nevada, Las Vegas to provide clinical training to
students of the Kirk Kerkorian School of Medicine. The duration of
the affiliation agreement must be for not less than 5 years.
(b) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee and the Oncology Excellence Committee created by
section 2 of this act, on or before December 18, 2026, that describes
each expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection
1 from the date on which the money was received by City of Hope
through December 1, 2026.
(c) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee and the Oncology Excellence Committee created by
section 2 of this act, on or before September 17, 2027, that describes
each expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection
1 from the date on which the money was received by City of Hope
through June 30, 2027.
(d) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of City of Hope, regardless of their form or location, that
the Legislative Auditor deems necessary to conduct an audit of the
use of the money appropriated pursuant to subsection 1.
4. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
-
*SB212*

– 3 –
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. 1. The Oncology Excellence Committee is hereby
created within the Department of Health and Human Services.
2. The Committee consists of the following nine members:
(a) Seven members appointed by the Governor:
(1) One of whom must be selected by the Board of County
Commissioners of Clark County;
(2) One of whom must be selected by the Dean of the Kirk
Kerkorian School of Medicine at the University of Nevada, Las
Vegas;
(3) One of whom must be selected by the Executive Director
of the Office of Economic Development;
(4) One of whom must be selected by the Director of the
Department of Health and Human Services;
(5) Two of whom must be selected by the Governor; and
(6) One of whom must be a representative of an organization
that advocates on behalf of persons with cancer.
(b) One member appointed by the Majority Leader of the
Senate.
(c) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.
3. The Committee shall:
(a) At its first meeting and annually thereafter, elect a Chair
from among its members;
(b) Meet at the call of the Chair or a majority of its members as
necessary, but not to exceed six meetings per year;
(c) Obtain confirmation that City of Hope has entered into the
agreement required by paragraph (a) of subsection 3 of section 1 of
this act, not later than January 1, 2026;
(d) Monitor the use of money appropriated to City of Hope
pursuant to subsection 1 of section 1 of this act to ensure that the
money is used only for the purposes listed in subsection 2 of section
1 of this act; and
(e) Notify the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau if it appears that:
(1) City of Hope has not entered into the agreement required
by paragraph (a) of subsection 3 of section 1 of this act on or before
January 1, 2026.
(2) Money appropriated pursuant to subsection 1 of section 1
of this act has been used for a purpose other than the purposes listed
in subsection 2 of section 1 of this act.
4. Each member of the Committee serves without
compensation and is not entitled to receive a per diem allowance or
travel expenses.
-
*SB212*

– 4 –
5. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
provide administrative support to the Committee as necessary to
carry out the duties of the Committee.
Sec. 3. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective on July 1,
2025.
3. Section 2 of this act expires by limitation on October 1,
2027.
H
-
*SB212*